Hawaii statutes.
§15-7 Absentee polling place. [Section
effective until December 31, 2015. For section effective January 1, 2016, see below.]
(a) Absentee polling places shall be established at the office of the
respective clerks, and may be established at such other sites as may be
designated by the clerk under the provisions prescribed in the rules adopted by
the chief election officer. Section 11-21 relating to changes and transfers of
registration shall apply to the absentee polling place as though it were the precinct
at which a person's name properly appears on the list of registered voters.

(b) The absentee polling places shall be open
no later than ten working days before election day, and all Saturdays falling
within that time period, or as soon thereafter as ballots are available;
provided that all absentee polling places shall be open on the same date
statewide, as determined by the chief election officer. [L 1975, c 36, pt of
§3; am L 1976, c 106, §4(2); am L 1992, c 129, §6; am L 1993, c 230, §3 and c 304,
§9; am L 1998, c 55, §1]

§15-7 Absentee polling place; registration
at absentee polling place. [Section effective January 1, 2016. For
section effective until December 31, 2015, see above.] (a) Absentee
polling places shall be established at the office of the respective clerks, and
may be established at other sites as may be designated by the clerk under the
provisions prescribed in the rules adopted by the chief election officer.
Section 11-21 relating to changes and transfers of registration shall apply to
the absentee polling place as though it were the precinct at which a person's
name properly appears on the list of registered voters.

(b) The absentee polling places shall be open
no later than ten working days before election day, and all Saturdays falling
within that time period, or as soon thereafter as ballots are available;
provided that all absentee polling places shall be open on the same date
statewide, as determined by the chief election officer.

(c) A person who is eligible to vote but is
not registered to vote may register by appearing in person at the absentee
polling place for the county in which the person maintains residence.

(d) The county clerk shall designate a
registration clerk, who may be an election official, at each of the absentee
polling places established in the county.

(e) The registration clerk shall process
applications for any person not registered to vote who submits a signed
affidavit in accordance with section 11-15, which shall include a sworn
affirmation:

(1) Of the person's qualification to vote;

(2) Acknowledging that the person has not voted and
will not vote at any other polling place for that election and has not cast and
will not cast any absentee ballot pursuant to chapter 15 for that election; and

(3) Acknowledging that providing false information
may result in a class C felony, punishable by a fine not exceeding $1,000 or
imprisonment not exceeding five years, or both.

(f) The registration clerk may accept, as
prima facie evidence, the allegation of the person in the application regarding
the person's residence in accordance with section 11-15(b), unless the
allegation is contested by a qualified voter. The registration clerk may
demand that the person furnish substantiating evidence to the other allegations
of the person's application in accordance with section 11-15(b).

(g) Registration may be challenged in
accordance with section 11-25.

(h) Notwithstanding subsection (c),
registration pursuant to this section may be used by a person who is registered
to vote but whose name cannot be found on the precinct list for the polling
place associated with the person's residence.

(i) The clerk of each county shall add persons
who properly register at an absentee polling place to the respective general
county register. Within thirty days of registration at an absentee polling
place, the county clerk shall mail to the person a notice including the
person's name, current street address, district and precinct, and date of
registration. A notice mailed pursuant to this subsection shall serve as prima
facie evidence that the person is a registered voter as of the date of
registration. [L 1975, c 36, pt of §3; am L 1976, c 106, §4(2); am L 1992, c
129, §6; am L 1993, c 230, §3 and c 304, §9; am L 1998, c 55, §1; am L 2014, c
166, §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next